Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1236
Nebraska State Patrol; rules and regulations.

The Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations supplemental to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 necessary or desirable to assure the public safety as well as to provide reasonable and adequate protection of the lives, health, and safety of persons employed in the manufacture, storage, transportation, handling, and use of explosives. The Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations necessary and proper for the administration of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 and, together with all other peace officers of the state and its political subdivisions, shall be charged with the enforcement of such sections.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 268;

Laws 1988, LB 893, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 15.